Maryland, session 2025, SB0045.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–201.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0045*

SENATE BILL 45
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “License” means a manufacturer’s, distributor’s, or factory branch’s license
issued by the Administration under this subtitle.
15–212.
(a) In this section, “motor home” means a motor vehicle that:
(1) Is designed to provide temporary living quarters, built into as an
integral part of, or permanently attached to, a self–propelled motor vehicle chassis or van;
and
(2) Contains permanently installed independent life support systems
which provide at least four of the following facilities:
(i) Cooking;
(ii) Refrigeration or ice box;
(iii) Self–contained toilet;
(iv) Heating, air–conditioning, or both;
(v) A potable water supply system including a faucet and sink;
(vi) Separate 110–125 volt electrical power supply; or
(vii) An LP gas supply.
(b) In addition to the other grounds specified in Subtitle 1 of this title for refusal,
suspension, or revocation of a license, the Administration may refuse to grant a license
under this subtitle to any person and may suspend, revoke, or refuse to renew the license
of any person if it finds that the person has:
(1) Made any material misrepresentation in transferring a vehicle or truck
component part to a dealer or distributor;
(2) Failed to comply with any written warranty agreement; or
(3) Failed to reasonably compensate any franchised dealer who does work
under:
(i) The vehicle preparation and delivery obligations of the dealer; or
(ii) Any outstanding express or implied new vehicle or truck
component parts warranty.

SENATE BILL 45 3
(c) (1) (I) A licensee shall specify in writing to each of its motor vehicle
dealers licensed in the State:
[(i)] 1. The dealer’s obligation for vehicle preparation, delivery,
warranties, and recalls on its products;
[(ii)] 2. The schedule of compensation to be paid to the dealers for
parts, including parts assemblies, and labor, including diagnostic labor and associated
administrative requirements, in connection with the service obligations established under
item (i) of this paragraph; and
[(iii)] 3. A time allowance for the performance of labor described in
this paragraph that is reasonable and adequate.
(II) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, MISCELLANEOUS
FEES INCLUDE:
1. SHOP SUPPLIES USED IN A REPAIR AND NORMALLY
CHARGED TO A CUSTOMER;
2. COSTS TO TRANSPORT VEHICLES FOR REPAIRS AT
THIRD–PARTY VENDORS AND NORMALLY CHARGED TO CUSTOMERS; AND
3. COSTS PAID TO A THIRD–PARTY VENDOR AND
NORMALLY CHARGED TO A CUSTOMER.
(III) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS PARAGRAPH, ASSOCIATED
ADMINISTRATIVE REQUIREMENTS INCLUDE TIME SPENT:
1. INSPECTING THE VEHICLE AND PREPARING REPORTS
TO THE LICENSEE;
2. CONTACTING THE LICENSEE TO DETERMINE PROPER
REPAIRS; AND
3. MAKING UNSUCCESSFUL REPAIRS DIRECTED BY THE
LICENSEE.
(2) Reasonable compensation under this section may not be less than:
(i) With respect to labor for warranty or recall repairs, the dealer’s
current labor rate for nonwarranty repairs of a like kind for retail customers; and

SENATE BILL 45
(ii) With respect to any part, the dealer’s cost plus its current retail
mark–up percentage charged to retail customers for nonwarranty repairs of a like kind.
(3) (i) For purposes of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the dealer’s
labor rate or parts mark–up percentage shall be established by a submission to the licensee
of whichever of the following produces fewer repair orders closed, as of the date of
submission, within the [preceding] FIRST 180 days DURING WHICH THE DEALER’S
LABOR RATE OR PARTS MARK–UP PERCENTAGE HAS BEEN IN EFFECT:
1. 100 qualifying sequential customer–paid repair orders; or
2. 90 days of qualifying customer–paid repair orders.
(ii) With respect to parts, a schedule of compensation established
under this subsection shall be equal to the parts mark–up percentage as reflected in
qualifying repair orders, calculated by dividing the total charges for parts in the repair
orders by the total dealer cost for the parts minus one.
(iii) 1. A dealer may not make a submission under this subsection
more than once in 1 year.
2. For purposes of subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph,
a revision or supplement to a submission to correct or clarify the submission does not
constitute a new submission.
(4) Repair orders for labor or parts in connection with any of the following
may not constitute a qualifying repair order under paragraph (2) of this subsection:
(i) Accessories;
(ii) Repairs for manufacturer, distributor, or factory branch special
events, promotions, or service campaigns;
(iii) Repairs related to collision;
(iv) Vehicle emission or safety inspections required by law;
(v) Parts sold, or repairs performed, at wholesale or for insurance
carriers, or other third–party payors;
(vi) Routine maintenance not covered under any warranty, including
maintenance involving fluids, filters, and belts not provided in the course of repairs;
(vii) Nuts, bolts, fasteners, and similar items that do not have an
individual parts number;
(viii) Tires;

SENATE BILL 45 5
(ix) Vehicle reconditioning;
(x) Goodwill or policy repairs or replacements; or
(xi) Repairs on vehicles from a different line–make.
(5) (I) If a licensee gives a dealer a part at no cost to use in performing
a repair under a recall, campaign service action, or warranty repair, the licensee shall
compensate the dealer for the part by paying the dealer the parts mark–up percentage
established under this subsection on the cost for the part listed on the licensee’s price
schedule.
(II) IF NO PRICE SCHEDULE EXISTS FOR A PART DESCRIBED IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE LICENSEE SHALL COMPENSATE THE
DEALER FOR THE PART BY PAYING THE DEALER THE PRICE OF THE PART BEING
REPLACED, OR THE PRICE OF THE PART MOST SIMILAR TO THE PART BEING
REPLACED.
(6) (i) The schedule of compensation submitted under paragraph (3) of
this subsection shall be presumed to be accurate and reasonable.
(ii) The licensee shall approve or rebut the dealer’s submission
within 30 days of receipt.
(iii) If the licensee approves a dealer’s submission, the licensee shall
begin compensating the dealer under the schedule within 30 days after the date of approval.
(iv) In the absence of a timely rebuttal by the licensee, the schedule
of compensation submitted by the dealer shall go into effect on the 31st day following the
licensee’s receipt of the schedule.
(v) Any rebuttal of the schedule of compensation by the licensee
shall:
1. Be delivered to the dealer within 30 days of the licensee’s
receipt of the schedule; and
2. Consist of reasonable substantiating evidence that the
declared rate is materially inaccurate.
(vi) In the event of a timely rebuttal, on resolution of the matter by
agreement of the parties or by administrative, judicial, or other action, a licensee’s payment
obligations under the resulting schedule of compensation shall begin on the 31st day
following a final order unless otherwise provided for by the fact finder.

SENATE BILL 45
(vii) 1. To the extent that any action commenced under subsection
[(d)] (E) of this section or § 15–213 or § 15–214 of this subtitle involves the application of
paragraph (3) of this subsection, the issues shall be limited to whether the labor rate or
parts mark–up percentage stated in the dealer’s submission was materially inaccurate.
2. A licensee shall have the burden of proving under this
subparagraph that the dealer’s submission was materially inaccurate.
(viii) 1. A licensee may verify a dealer’s effective rates once
annually.
2. If a licensee finds that a dealer’s effective rates have
increased or decreased, the licensee may increase or decrease, respectively, the warranty
reimbursement rate prospectively.
(7) A licensee may not directly or indirectly:
(i) Calculate its own labor rate or parts mark–up percentage on a
warranty reimbursement rate submission by the licensee’s dealer under this section, or
require a dealer to calculate a labor rate or parts mark–up percentage, by any method not
required under this section, including a method that is unduly burdensome or
time–consuming or that requires information that is unduly burdensome or
time–consuming to provide such as:
1. A part–by–part or transaction–by–transaction
calculation; or
2. Presentation of information as to, or calculations based on,
the dealer’s or other dealers’ warranty compensation;
(ii) Establish or implement a special part or component number for
parts used in warranty fulfillment, if the special part or component number results in
reduced compensation for the dealer [unless the part is used for specific, limited repair
situations];
(iii) Require or coerce a dealer to change the prices for which it sells
parts or labor for retail customer repairs;
(iv) Take adverse action against a dealer because the dealer seeks
compensation under this section, by:
1. Implementing a process that is inconsistent with the
licensee’s obligations to the dealer under this subtitle; or
2. Failing to act in good faith;

SENATE BILL 45 7
(v) Conduct any warranty or retail customer repair audit, or other
service–related audit, solely because the dealer makes a request for warranty
reimbursement at retail rates in the ordinary course of business; [or]
(vi) Establish, implement, enforce, or apply any policy, standard,
rule, program, or incentive regarding the compensation due under this section other than
in a uniform manner among the licensee’s dealers in the State;
(VII) SELL VEHICLE PARTS DIRECTLY TO RETAIL CUSTOMERS;
(VIII) REQUIRE OR COERCE A DEALER TO ENGAGE WITH A
THIRD–PARTY MANUFACTURER FOR REPAIRS TO ANY PART INSTALLED ON A
VEHICLE BY THE LICENSEE; OR
(IX) ESTABLISH OR IMPLEMENT A PRICING STRUCTURE THAT
CHARGES A DIFFERENT RATE FOR A PART BASED ON THE USE OF THE PART.
(8) The provisions of paragraphs (1) through (7) of this subsection do not
apply to travel trailers or parts of systems, fixtures, appliances, furnishings, accessories,
and features of motor homes that are not manufactured by the manufacturer of the motor
home as a part of the unit.
(9) (i) A claim filed under this section by a dealer with a manufacturer
or distributor shall be:
1. In the manner and form reasonably prescribed by the
manufacturer or distributor; and
2. Approved or disapproved within 30 days of receipt.
(ii) A claim not approved or disapproved within 30 days of receipt
shall be deemed approved.
(iii) Payment of or credit issued on a claim filed under this section
shall be made within 30 days of approval.
(IV) 1. A. IF THE LICENSEE SEEKS THE RETURN OF ANY
PART REPLACED BY A DEALER IN CONNECTION WITH A CLAIM FILED UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE LICENSEE SHALL REQUEST THE RETURN WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER
RECEIPT OF THE CLAIM.
B. IF THE LICENSEE DOES NOT REQUEST THE RETURN
OF A REPLACED PART WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE CLAIM, THE DEALER
MAY DISPOSE OF THE REPLACED PART.

SENATE BILL 45
2. IF THE LICENSEE REQUESTS THE RETURN OF A
REPLACED PART, THE LICENSEE SHALL COMPENSATE THE DEALER FOR THE COST
OF RETURNING THE REPLACED PART.
(10) A dealer’s failure to comply with a specific requirement of the
manufacturer or distributor may not constitute grounds for denial of the claim or reduction
of the amount of compensation paid to the dealer if the dealer presents documentation or
other reasonable evidence to substantiate that the repair and the claim were done according
to manufacturer warranty guidelines.
(11) (i) If a claim filed under this section is shown by the manufacturer
or distributor to be false or unsubstantiated, the manufacturer or distributor may charge
back the claim within 9 months from the date the claim was paid or credit issued.
(ii) This paragraph does not limit the right of a manufacturer or
distributor to:
1. Conduct an audit of any claim filed under this section; or
2. Charge back for any claim that is proven to be fraudulent.
(iii) An audit under this paragraph shall be conducted according to
generally accepted accounting principles.
(12) A licensee may not prohibit a dealer from, or take any adverse action
against a dealer for, providing to a customer information given to the dealer by a
manufacturer related to any condition that may substantially affect motor vehicle safety,
durability, reliability, or performance.
(13) A dealer may provide the information specified in paragraph (12) of this
subsection only to a customer that has:
(i) Purchased the vehicle for which the information pertains from
the dealer; or
(ii) Had the vehicle for which the information pertains serviced by
the dealer.
(14) A licensee may not deny a claim, reduce the amount of compensation to
a dealer, or process a charge back to a dealer for performing covered warranty or required
recall repairs on a vehicle:
(i) For resolving a condition covered by the licensee’s original
warranty;
(ii) For remedying a safety–related defect that is subject to an
outstanding recall under federal law;

SENATE BILL 45 9
(iii) If the dealer properly performed the repairs and submitted the
claims; [or]
(iv) If the dealer discovered the need for repairs:
1. During the course of a separate repair requested by the
customer; or
2. Through notice of an outstanding recall under federal law
for a safety–related defect; OR
(V) IF THE LICENSEE LACKS A PUBLISHED BOOK RATE FOR THE
REPAIR.
(d) (1) IF A DEALER’S FRANCHISE CEASES TO EXIST, THE DEALER MAY:
(I) COMPLETE ANY WARRANTY OR RECALL REPAIR THAT IS
UNDERWAY AT THE TIME THE FRANCHISE CEASES TO EXIST; OR
(II) BEGIN AND COMPLETE ANY WARRANTY OR RECALL REPAIR
ON A VEHICLE SOLD BY THE DEALER TO A RETAIL CUSTOMER WHILE THE FRANCHISE
EXISTED.
(2) FOR ANY REPAIR CONDUCTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE
LICENSEE SHALL COMPENSATE THE DEALER ACCORDING TO:
(I) THIS SECTION; AND
(II) THE TERMS OF THE FRANCHISE AS IT EXISTED BEFORE
CEASING TO EXIST.
(E) As to any person licensed under this subtitle, instead of or in addition to
revocation, suspension, or nonrenewal of a license under this section, the Administrator:
(1) May order the licensee to pay a fine not exceeding $50,000 for each
violation of this subtitle; and
(2) May order the licensee to compensate any person for financial injury or
other damage suffered as a result of the violation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.